North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-24.4 Nursing Home Rates
50-24.4-18.1.
Rates pending reconsideration and appeal.

For purposes of this section:

“Final decision rate” means the amount, if any, determined on a per day basis, by which a rate otherwise set under this chapter is increased as a result of a request for reconsideration made under section 50-24.4-17, a request for an administrative appeal under section 50-24.4-18, or a request for judicial appeal under chapter 28-32 taken from a decision on an administrative appeal.

“Pending decision rate” means the amount, determined on a per day basis, by which a rate otherwise set under this chapter would increase if a nursing home prevails on a request for reconsideration made under section 50-24.4-17, on a request for an administrative appeal under section 50-24.4-18, or on a request for a judicial appeal under chapter 28-32 taken from a decision on an administrative appeal; however, the amount may not cause any component of the rate to exceed rate limits established under this chapter or through rules adopted under section 50-24.4-02.

If a nursing home has made a request for reconsideration under section 50-24.4-17, taken an administrative appeal under section 50-24.4-18, or taken a judicial appeal under chapter 28-32 from a decision on an administrative appeal, and has provided information sufficient to allow the department to accurately calculate, on a per day basis, the effect of each of the disputed issues on the nursing home’s rate, the department shall determine and issue a pending decision rate within thirty days of receipt of the request for reconsideration, administrative appeal, or judicial appeal. If the information furnished is insufficient to determine a pending decision rate, the department, within thirty days of receipt of the request for reconsideration, shall inform the facility of the insufficiency and may identify information that would correct the insufficiency.

The department shall add the pending decision rate to the rate that would otherwise be set under this chapter, and, notwithstanding section 50-24.4-19, the total must be the rate chargeable to private-paying residents until a final decision on the request for reconsideration or appeal is made and is no longer subject to further appeal.

The nursing home shall establish and maintain records that reflect the amount of any pending decision rate paid by each private-paying resident from the date the nursing home charges a private-paying resident the pending decision rate.

If the pending decision rate paid by a private-paying resident exceeds the final decision rate, the nursing home shall refund the difference, plus interest at the legal rate, within sixty days after the final decision is no longer subject to appeal. If a nursing home fails to provide a timely refund to a living resident or former resident, the nursing home shall pay interest at three times the legal rate for the period after the refund is due. If a former resident is deceased, the nursing home shall pay the refund to a person lawfully administering the estate of the deceased former resident or lawfully acting as successor to the deceased former resident. If no person is lawfully administering the estate or lawfully acting as a successor, the nursing home may make any disposition of the refund permitted by law. Interest paid under this subsection is a nonallowable cost.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 486, § 1.

50-24.4-19.
Prohibited practices. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

A nursing home is not eligible to receive medical assistance payments unless it refrains from all of the following:

Charging private-paying residents rates for similar services which exceed those rates which are approved by the department for medical assistance recipients, as determined by the prospective desk audit rate, except under the following circumstances: the nursing home may charge private-paying residents a higher rate for a private room and charge for special services which are not included in the daily rate if medical assistance residents are charged separately at the same rate for the same services in addition to the daily rate paid by the department of human services. Services covered by the payment rate must be the same regardless of payment source. Special services, if offered, must be offered to all residents and charged separately at the same rate. Residents are free to select or decline special services. Special services must not include services which must be provided by the nursing home in order to comply with licensure or certification standards and that if not provided would result in a deficiency or violation by the nursing home. Services beyond those required to comply with licensure or certification standards must not be charged separately as a special service if they were included in the payment rate for the previous reporting year. A nursing home that charges a private-paying resident a rate in violation of this chapter is subject to an action by the state or any of its subdivisions or agencies for civil damages. A private-paying resident or the resident’s legal representative has a cause of action for civil damages against a nursing home that charges the resident rates in violation of this chapter. The damages awarded shall include three times the payments that result from the violation, together with costs and disbursements, including reasonable attorney’s fees or their equivalent.

Requiring an applicant for admission to the home, or the guardian or conservator of the applicant, as a condition of admission, to pay any fee or deposit, loan any money to the nursing home, or promise to leave all or part of the applicant’s estate to the home.

Requiring any resident of the nursing home to utilize a vendor of health care services who is a licensed physician or pharmacist chosen by the nursing home.

Providing differential treatment on the basis of status with regard to public assistance.

Discriminating in admissions, services offered, or room assignment on the basis of status with regard to public assistance. Admissions discrimination shall include, but is not limited to:

Basing admissions decisions upon assurance by the applicant to the nursing home, or the applicant’s guardian or conservator, that the applicant is neither eligible for nor will seek public assistance for payment of nursing home care costs.

Engaging in preferential selection from waiting lists based on an applicant’s ability to pay privately.

Requiring any vendor of medical care, who is reimbursed by medical assistance under a separate fee schedule, to pay any portion of the vendor’s fee to the nursing home except as payment for the fair market value of renting or leasing space or equipment of the nursing home or purchasing support services, if those agreements are disclosed to the department.

Refusing, for more than twenty-four hours, to accept a resident returning to the resident’s same bed or a bed certified for the same level of care, in accordance with a physician’s order authorizing transfer, after receiving inpatient hospital services.

Violating any of the rights of health care facility residents enumerated in section 50-10.2-02.

Charging a managed care organization a rate that is less than the rate approved by the department for a medical assistance recipient in the same classification.

The collection and use by a nursing home of financial information of any applicant pursuant to a preadmission screening program does not raise an inference that the nursing home is utilizing that information for any purpose prohibited by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 19; 1999, ch. 428, § 2; 2005, ch. 432, § 7; 2021, ch. 374, § 5, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 460, effective September 1, 2022.

Note.

Section 50-24.4-19 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 5 of Chapter 374, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1090; and Section 460 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247.

50-24.4-19.
Prohibited practices. [Effective September 1, 2022]

A nursing home is not eligible to receive medical assistance payments unless it refrains from all of the following:

Charging private-paying residents rates for similar services which exceed those rates which are approved by the department for medical assistance recipients, as determined by the prospective desk audit rate, except under the following circumstances: the nursing home may charge private-paying residents a higher rate for a private room and charge for special services which are not included in the daily rate if medical assistance residents are charged separately at the same rate for the same services in addition to the daily rate paid by the department. Services covered by the payment rate must be the same regardless of payment source. Special services, if offered, must be offered to all residents and charged separately at the same rate. Residents are free to select or decline special services. Special services must not include services which must be provided by the nursing home in order to comply with licensure or certification standards and that if not provided would result in a deficiency or violation by the nursing home. Services beyond those required to comply with licensure or certification standards must not be charged separately as a special service if they were included in the payment rate for the previous reporting year. A nursing home that charges a private-paying resident a rate in violation of this chapter is subject to an action by the state or any of its subdivisions or agencies for civil damages. A private-paying resident or the resident’s legal representative has a cause of action for civil damages against a nursing home that charges the resident rates in violation of this chapter. The damages awarded shall include three times the payments that result from the violation, together with costs and disbursements, including reasonable attorney’s fees or their equivalent.

Requiring an applicant for admission to the home, or the guardian or conservator of the applicant, as a condition of admission, to pay any fee or deposit in excess of one hundred dollars, loan any money to the nursing home, or promise to leave all or part of the applicant’s estate to the home.

Requiring any resident of the nursing home to utilize a vendor of health care services who is a licensed physician or pharmacist chosen by the nursing home.

Providing differential treatment on the basis of status with regard to public assistance.

Discriminating in admissions, services offered, or room assignment on the basis of status with regard to public assistance. Admissions discrimination shall include, but is not limited to:

Basing admissions decisions upon assurance by the applicant to the nursing home, or the applicant’s guardian or conservator, that the applicant is neither eligible for nor will seek public assistance for payment of nursing home care costs.

Engaging in preferential selection from waiting lists based on an applicant’s ability to pay privately.

Requiring any vendor of medical care, who is reimbursed by medical assistance under a separate fee schedule, to pay any portion of the vendor’s fee to the nursing home except as payment for the fair market value of renting or leasing space or equipment of the nursing home or purchasing support services, if those agreements are disclosed to the department.

Refusing, for more than twenty-four hours, to accept a resident returning to the resident’s same bed or a bed certified for the same level of care, in accordance with a physician’s order authorizing transfer, after receiving inpatient hospital services.

Violating any of the rights of health care facility residents enumerated in section 50-10.2-02.

Charging a managed care organization a rate that is less than the rate approved by the department for a medical assistance recipient in the same classification.

The collection and use by a nursing home of financial information of any applicant pursuant to a preadmission screening program does not raise an inference that the nursing home is utilizing that information for any purpose prohibited by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 19; 1999, ch. 428, § 2; 2005, ch. 432, § 7; 2021, ch. 374, § 5, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 460, effective September 1, 2022.

50-24.4-19.1.
Rates for private rooms — Payments by a third party on behalf of medical assistance recipients.

Notwithstanding section 50-24.4-19, a nursing home may receive a payment, in addition to payment of the rate set under this chapter, for the use of a private room by a resident who receives medical assistance benefits if:

The private room is not medically necessary;

The resident, or another person acting on behalf of the resident, has requested the private room and the nursing home informs the person making the request, at the time of the request, of the amount of the payment; and

The payment does not exceed the amount that the nursing home charges private-paying residents for a private room under subsection 1 of section 50-24.4-19.

For purposes of this chapter, a private room is a covered service only if medically necessary for the care of a resident.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 516, § 1.

50-24.4-19.2.
Residents with extraordinary needs.

The department shall develop criteria identifying extraordinary medical needs so severe as to make it difficult for affected persons to secure necessary care in nursing facilities. The department shall consider those extraordinary medical needs that may be associated with extensive pulmonary disease, specialized rehabilitation, and ventilator dependence. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the department may determine rates for nursing home residents with extraordinary medical needs. The department shall consider the costs of alternative care or treatment in determining rates for nursing home residents with extraordinary medical needs. A rate so determined by the department is effective for services provided after:

The department has agreed that the criteria are met;

The facility has agreed to provide necessary services at that rate; and

For periods when the person is not eligible for medical assistance, the person or anyone who may lawfully act on the person’s behalf, has agreed to the rate.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 487, § 1.

50-24.4-20.
Temporary payments — Correction orders.

For a period not to exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of mailing formal notice, the department may continue to make medical assistance payments to a nursing home which is in violation of this chapter if extreme hardship to the residents would otherwise result. In these cases, the department shall issue an order requiring the nursing home to correct the violation. The nursing home has twenty days from its receipt of the order to correct the violation. If the violation is not corrected within the twenty-day period, the department may reduce the payment rate to the nursing home by up to twenty percent. The amount of the payment rate reduction must be related to the severity of the violation and must remain in effect until the violation is corrected. The nursing home may seek reconsideration of or appeal the department’s action pursuant to the provisions of sections 50-24.4-17 and 50-24.4-18.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 20.

50-24.4-21.
Termination.

If a nursing home terminates its participation in the medical assistance program, whether voluntarily or involuntarily, the department may authorize the nursing home to receive continued reimbursement only on a temporary basis until medical assistance residents can be relocated to nursing homes participating in the medical assistance program.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 21.

50-24.4-22.
Exception.

In the event that the state is determined by the federal government to be no longer eligible for the federal share of medical assistance payments made to a nursing home under this chapter, the department may cease medical assistance payments to that nursing home.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 22.

50-24.4-23.
Reporting requirements.

No later than October first of each year, each nursing home that receives medical assistance payments from the department shall:

Except for state-owned facilities, provide the department with a copy of its audited report that meets the reporting standards of the American institute of certified public accountants and includes an audited statement of the rate or rates charged to private-paying residents. The examination by the certified public accountant must be conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards as promulgated and adopted by the American institute of certified public accountants;

Provide the department with a statement of ownership for the facility or a certification that ownership has not changed since the most recent statement given pursuant to this subsection;

Provide the department with audited financial statements as specified in subdivision a for every other facility owned in whole or in part by an individual or entity which has an ownership interest in the facility;

Upon request, provide the department with audited financial statements as specified in subdivision a for every organization with which the facility conducts business and which is owned in whole or in part by an individual or entity which has an ownership interest in the facility;

Provide the department with copies of leases, purchase agreements, appraisals, financing arrangements, and other documents related to the lease or purchase of the nursing facility, or a certification that the content of any such document remains unchanged since the most recent statement given pursuant to this subsection;

Upon request, provide the department with copies of leases, purchase agreements, and other documents related to the acquisition of equipment, goods, and services which are claimed as allowable costs; and

Permit access by the department to the certified public accountant’s audit workpapers which support the audited financial statements required in subdivisions a, c, and d.

Documents or information provided to the department pursuant to this chapter must be public. If the requirements of subsection 1 are not met, the reimbursement rate may be reduced to eighty percent of the rate in effect on the first day of the fourth calendar month after the close of the reporting year, and the reduction must continue until the requirements are met.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 23; 2001, ch. 430, § 1.

50-24.4-24.
Incomplete or inaccurate reports.

The department may reject any annual cost report filed by a nursing home pursuant to this chapter if the department determines that the report or the information required in section 50-24.4-23 has been filed in a form that is incomplete or inaccurate. In the event that a report is rejected pursuant to this chapter, the department may reduce the reimbursement rate to a nursing home to eighty percent of its most recently established rate until the information is completely and accurately filed.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 24.

50-24.4-25.
Extensions.

The department may grant an extension of the reporting deadline, not to exceed thirty days, to a nursing home for good cause.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 25; 1995, ch. 471, § 1.

50-24.4-26.
False reports.

If a nursing home knowingly supplies inaccurate or false information in a required report that results in an overpayment, the department shall:

Immediately adjust the nursing home’s payment rate to recover the entire overpayment within the rate year;

Terminate the department’s agreement with the nursing home;

Prosecute under applicable state or federal law; or

Use any combination of the foregoing actions.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 26.

50-24.4-27.
Medicare certification.

All nursing facilities certified under the medical assistance program shall participate in Medicare part A and part B with respect to at least thirty percent of the beds in the facility unless, after submitting an application, Medicare certification is denied by the federal health care financing administration. The facility shall file on behalf of each patient or assist each patient in the filing of requests for any third-party benefits to which the patient may be entitled. Charges for Medicare-covered services provided to residents who are simultaneously eligible for medical assistance and Medicare must be billed to Medicare part A or part B before billing medical assistance. Medical assistance may be billed only for charges not reimbursed by Medicare.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 27; 1991, ch. 519, § 1; 2005, ch. 432, § 8.

50-24.4-28.
Implementation.

The department shall seek appropriations to implement this chapter during and after the rate year beginning January 1, 1990.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 28.

50-24.4-29.
Geropsychiatric facilities.

The department may select one or more nursing homes within the state to operate a unit that exclusively provides geropsychiatric services. Admission to one of the nursing homes that exclusively provides geropsychiatric services for the purpose of receiving geropsychiatric services may be granted only after the state hospital has performed an evaluation of the individual being admitted which indicates the individual is in need of nursing home geropsychiatric services. If at any time the department determines that the number of approved geropsychiatric units in the state is insufficient to meet the needs, the department may select a geropsychiatric unit based on the experience, qualification, and capacity of the nursing homes that propose to provide geropsychiatric services. The state hospital may not offer geropsychiatric services through a unit set up exclusively to provide those services.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 34, § 15; 2007, ch. 429, § 1; 2013, ch. 382, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1, ch. 382, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 429, S.L. 2007 became effective March 2, 2007, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 2 of chapter 429, S.L. 2007.

50-24.4-30.
Government nursing facility funding pool. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 436, § 2.